Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 9. Purchase of Railroad Property

§ 37-9-901.
City and county authority to acquire and lease railroad lines and to receive grants and loans.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, cities, towns or counties within the state acting either singly or jointly pursuant to the Wyoming Joint Powers Act are authorized to:

Purchase, own, improve, rehabilitate, maintain, repair or replace railroad lines;

Lease or let any portion of the railroad lines referred to in paragraph (a)(i) of this section to any private person, company, corporation or carrier upon terms and conditions and for either a fixed fee or a fee based on a percentage of the revenue collected from the railroad operation as determined by the governing body or bodies; and

Apply for and accept grants, loans or loan guarantees as authorized by law to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 88, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Joint Powers Act. —

See §§

16-1-102

, 16-1-103(a)(ii).

§ 37-9-902.
Limitations of authority.

The actions authorized in W.S.

37-9-901

may be taken only if a rail carrier has:

Abandoned or filed an application to abandon railroad lines with the proper regulatory authority; or

Taken action leading to potential abandonment of railroad lines as required by the proper regulatory authority.

No city, town or county acting either singly or jointly may operate a railroad or provide railroad services.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a city, town or county acting either singly or jointly shall not purchase railroad lines at a price greater than the net salvage value or fair market value of the railroad lines as determined by the proper regulatory authority. This subsection does not prohibit a city, town or county acting either singly or jointly from negotiating a settlement of the net salvage value or fair market value of the railroad lines.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 88, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to railroad abandonment, see article 10 of this chapter.

§ 37-9-903.
Liability insurance; immunity.

A city, town or county acting either singly or jointly shall require a lessee of railroad lines to obtain comprehensive liability insurance covering damages resulting from the operation of a railroad leased by the city, town, county or joint powers board pursuant to W.S. 37-9-901(a)(ii).

A city, town or county acting either singly or jointly is immune from liability arising out of any claim, demand, suit or judgment for any damage or injury caused by or involving the operation of a railroad. The lessee of any railroad lines leased by a city, town, county or joint powers board is liable for any injury or damage caused by or involving the operation of railroad lines and no cause of action is allowed against the city, town, county or joint powers board for any injuries or damages caused by or involving the operation of railroad lines.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 88, § 1.